Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1571.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-448, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-448. Formation of unified school district; board membership; budget A. One or more common school districts and a high school district with coterminous or overlapping boundaries may establish a unified school district pursuant to this section. Unification of a common school district and a high school district is not authorized by this section if any of the high school facilities owned by the new unified school district would not be located within its boundaries. B. Formation of a unified school district shall be by resolutions approved by the governing boards of the unifying school districts and certification of approval by such governing boards to the county school superintendent of the county or counties in which such individual school districts are located.  A common school district and high school district that unify pursuant to this section shall not exclude from the same unification a common school district that has overlapping boundaries with the high school district and that wishes to unify. Except as provided in subsection D of this section, the formation of a unified school district becomes effective on July 1 of the next fiscal year following the certification of the county school superintendent. An election is not required to form a unified school district pursuant to this section. Notice of the proposed vote of the governing boards on the resolutions prescribed in this subsection shall be posted in at least three public places in each of the school districts proposed to be unified at least ninety days before the proposed vote. At least ninety days before the governing boards vote on the resolutions prescribed in this subsection, the governing boards shall mail a pamphlet to each household with one or more qualified electors that lists the full cash value, the assessed valuation and the estimated amount of the primary property taxes and the estimated amount of the secondary property taxes under the proposed unification for each of the following: 1. An owner-occupied residence whose assessed valuation is the average assessed valuation of property classified as class three, as prescribed by section 42-12003 for the current year in the school district. 2. An owner-occupied residence whose assessed valuation is one-half of the assessed valuation of the residence in paragraph 1 of this subsection. 3. An owner-occupied residence whose assessed valuation is twice the assessed valuation of the residence in paragraph 1 of this subsection. 4. A business whose assessed valuation is the average of the assessed valuation of property classified as class one, as prescribed by section 42-12001, paragraphs 12 and 13 for the current year in the school district. C. The boundaries of the unified school district shall be the boundaries of the former common school district or districts that unify.  The boundaries of the common school district or districts that are not unifying remain unchanged.  The county school superintendent, immediately on receipt of the approved resolutions prescribed by subsection B of this section, shall file with the board of supervisors, the county assessor and the superintendent of public instruction a transcript of the boundaries of the unified school district. The boundaries shown in the transcript shall become the legal boundaries of the school districts on July 1 of the next fiscal year. D. On formation of the unified school district, the governing board consists of the members of the former school district governing boards and the members shall hold office until January 1 following the first general election after formation of the district.  For the purpose of all actions that are necessary to operate the unified district for the next year, the unified school district governing board is constituted and may conduct meetings after the adoption of the unification resolutions prescribed by subsection B of this section. E. Beginning on January 1 following the first general election after formation of the unified school district, the governing board shall have five members.  At the first general election after the formation of the district, members shall be elected in the following manner: 1. The three candidates receiving the highest, the second highest and the third highest number of votes shall be elected to four-year terms. 2. The two candidates receiving the fourth and fifth highest number of votes shall be elected to two-year terms. Thereafter all offices shall have four-year terms. F. The new unified school district may appoint a resident of the remaining common school district to serve as a nonvoting member of the governing board to represent the interests of the high school pupils who reside in the remaining common school district and who attend school in the unified school district. G. For the first year of operation, the unified school district governing board shall prepare a consolidated budget based on the student counts from the school districts comprising the unified school district. The unified school district may budget for unification assistance pursuant to section 15-912.01. H. The governing board of the unified school district shall prepare policies, curricula and budgets for the district. These policies shall require that: 1. The base compensation of each certificated teacher for the first year of operation of the new unified school district shall not be lower than the certificated teacher's base compensation for the prior year in the previously existing school districts. 2. The certificated teacher's years of employment in the previously existing school districts shall be included in determining the teacher's certificated years of employment in the new unified school district. I. On formation of a unified school district, any existing override authorization of the former high school district and the former common school district or districts shall continue until expiration based on the revenue control limit of the school district or districts that had override authorization before unification. The unified school district may request new override authorization for the one or more budget year years as provided in section 15-481 based on the combined revenue control limit of the new district after unification. If the unified school district's request for override authorization is approved, it will replace any existing override for the each budget year for which an override authorization is approved. J. The unified school district shall admit high school pupils who reside in a common school district that was located within the boundaries of the former high school district. For the purposes of determining student count and for apportionment of state aid, the school membership of these pupils is deemed to be enrollment in the unified school district. K. All assets and liabilities of the unifying school districts shall be transferred and assumed by the new unified school district. Any existing bonded indebtedness of a common school district or a high school district unifying pursuant to this section shall be assumed by the new unified school district and shall be regarded as an indebtedness of the new unified school district for the purpose of determining the debt incurring authority of the district.  Taxes for the payment of such bonded indebtedness shall be levied on all taxable property in the new unified school district, but nothing in this subsection shall be construed to relieve from liability to taxation for the payment of all taxable property of the former high school district if necessary to prevent a default in the payment of any bonded indebtedness of the former high school district.  The residents of a common school district that does not unify shall not vote in bond or override elections of the unified school district and shall not be assessed taxes as a result of a bond or override election of the unified school district. L. If the remaining common school district had authorization for an override as provided in section 15-481 or 15-482, the override authorization continues for the remaining common school district or districts in the same manner as before the formation of the unified school district. M. The bonding authorization and bonding limitations continue for the remaining common school district or districts in the same manner as before the formation of the unified school district. N. This section does not relieve a school district formed pursuant to section 15-457 or 15-458 of its liability for any outstanding bonded indebtedness. 0. For school districts that become unified after July 1, 2004 and where all of the common schools were eligible for the small school district weight pursuant to section 15-943, paragraph 1, subdivision (a) when computing their base support level and base revenue control limit before unification, the unified school district may continue to use the small school district weight as follows: 1. Annually determine the common school student count and the weighted student count pursuant to section 15-943, paragraph 1, subdivision (a) for each common school district before unification. 2. Calculate the sum of the common school districts' student counts and weighted student counts determined in paragraph 1 of this subsection. 3. Divide the sum of the weighted student counts by the sum of the student counts determined in paragraph 2 of this subsection. 4. The amount determined in paragraph 3 of this subsection shall be the weight for the common schools in the unified school district. P. A unified school district may calculate its revenue control limit and district support level by using subsection O of this section as follows: 1. Determine the number of individual school districts that existed before unification into a single school district. 2. Multiply the amount determined in paragraph 1 of this subsection by six hundred. 3. Multiply the amount determined in paragraph 2 of this subsection by 0.80. 4. If the amount determined in paragraph 3 of this subsection exceeds the student count of the unified school district, the unified school district is eligible to use subsection O of this section. Q. Subsections O and P of this section shall remain in effect until the aggregate student count of the common school districts before unification exceeds the aggregate number of students of the common school districts before unification authorized to utilize section 15-943, paragraph 1, subdivision (a). END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 15-481, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-481. Override election; budget increases; informational pamphlet; notice; ballot; effect A. If a proposed budget of a school district exceeds the aggregate budget limit for the any budget year, at least ninety days before the proposed election the governing board shall order an override election to be held on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November as prescribed by section 16-204, subsection F for the purpose of presenting the proposed budget to the qualified electors of the school district who by a majority of those voting either shall affirm or reject the budget. At the same time as the order of the election, the governing board shall publicly declare the deadline for submitting arguments, as set by the county school superintendent pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 9 of this section, to be submitted in the informational pamphlet and shall immediately post the deadline in a prominent location on the district's website. In addition, the governing board shall prepare an alternate budget that does not include an increase in the budget of more than the amount allowed as provided in section 15-905. If the qualified electors approve the proposed budget, the governing board of the school district shall follow the procedures prescribed in section 15-905 for adopting a budget that includes the authorized increase. If the qualified electors disapprove the proposed budget, the governing board shall follow the procedures prescribed in section 15-905 for adopting a budget that does not include the proposed increase or the portion of the proposed increase that exceeds the amount authorized by a previously approved budget increase as prescribed in subsection P of this section. B. The county school superintendent shall prepare an informational pamphlet on the proposed increase in the budget and a sample ballot and, at least forty days before the election, shall transmit the informational pamphlet and the sample ballot to the governing board of the school district. The governing board, on receipt of the informational pamphlet and the ballot, shall mail or distribute the informational pamphlet and the ballot to the households in which qualified electors reside within the school district at least thirty-five days before the election. Any distribution of material concerning the proposed increase in the budget shall not be conducted by children enrolled in the school district. The informational pamphlet shall contain the following information: 1. The date of the election. 2. The voter's polling place and the times it is open. 3. The proposed total increase in the budget that exceeds the amount allowed pursuant to section 15-905. 4. The total amount of the current year's budget, the total amount of the proposed budget and the total amount of the alternate budget. 5. If the override is for a period of more than one year, a statement indicating the number of years the proposed increase in the budget would be in effect and the percentage of the school district's revenue control limit that the district is requesting for the future years. 6. The proposed total amount of revenues that will fund the increase in the budget and the amount that will be obtained from a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the first year for which the budget increase was adopted. 7. The proposed amount of revenues that will fund the increase in the budget and that will be obtained from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the first year for which the budget increase was adopted. 8. The dollar amount and the purpose for which the proposed increase in the budget is to be expended for the first year for which the budget increase was adopted. The purpose statement shall only present factual information in a neutral manner. Advocacy for the expenditures is strictly limited to the arguments submitted pursuant to paragraph 9 of this subsection. 9. At least two arguments, if submitted, but not more than ten arguments for and two arguments, if submitted, but not more than ten arguments against the proposed increase in the budget. The arguments shall be in a form prescribed by the county school superintendent, and each argument shall not exceed two hundred words. Arguments for the proposed increase in the budget shall be provided in writing and signed by the governing board. The ballot arguments for the proposed increase in the budget shall be signed as the governing board of the school district without listing any member's individual name for the arguments for the proposed increase. If submitted, additional arguments in favor of the proposed increase in the budget shall be provided in writing with a signed, sworn statement by those in favor. Arguments against the proposed increase in the budget shall be provided in writing with a signed, sworn statement by those in opposition. If the argument is submitted by an organization, it shall contain the sworn statement of two executive officers of the organization. If the argument is submitted by a political committee, it shall contain the sworn statement of the committee's chairperson or treasurer. If the argument is submitted by an individual and not on behalf of an organization, a political committee or any other group, the person shall submit the argument with a sworn, notarized statement. The names of persons and entities submitting written arguments shall be included in the informational pamphlet. Persons signing the argument shall identify themselves by giving their residence address and telephone number, which may not appear in the informational pamphlet, except that the person's city or town and state of residence shall appear in the pamphlet. Any argument that is submitted and that does not comply with this paragraph may not be included in the pamphlet. The county school superintendent shall review all factual statements contained in the written arguments and correct any inaccurate statements of fact. The superintendent shall not review and correct any portion of the written arguments that are identified as statements of the author's opinion. The county school superintendent shall make the written arguments available to the public as provided in title 39, chapter 1, article 2. A deadline for submitting arguments to be included in the informational pamphlet shall be set by the county school superintendent. 10. A statement that the alternate budget shall be adopted by the governing board if the proposed budget is not adopted by the qualified electors of the school district. 11. The current limited property value and the net assessed valuation provided by the department of revenue, the first year tax rate for the proposed override and the estimated amount of the secondary property taxes if the proposed budget is adopted for each of the following: (a) An owner-occupied residence whose assessed valuation is the average assessed valuation of property classified as class three, as prescribed by section 42-12003 for the current year in the school district. (b) An owner-occupied residence whose assessed valuation is one-half of the assessed valuation of the residence in subdivision (a) of this paragraph. (c) An owner-occupied residence whose assessed valuation is twice the assessed valuation of the residence in subdivision (a) of this paragraph. (d) A business whose assessed valuation is the average of the assessed valuation of property classified as class one, as prescribed by section 42-12001, paragraphs 12 and 13 for the current year in the school district. 12. If the election is conducted pursuant to subsection L or M of this section, the following information: (a) An executive summary of the school district's most recent capital improvement plan submitted to the school facilities oversight board. (b) A complete list of each proposed capital improvement that will be funded with the budget increase and a description of the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (c) The tax rate associated with each of the proposed capital improvements and the estimated cost of each capital improvement for the owner of a single family home that is valued at $80,000. C. For the purpose of this section, the school district may use its staff, equipment, materials, buildings or other resources only to distribute the informational pamphlet at the school district office or at public hearings and to produce such information as required in subsection B of this section.  This subsection does not preclude school districts from holding or participating in any public hearings at which testimony is given by at least one person for the proposed increase and one person against the proposed increase. Any written information provided by the district pertaining to the override election shall include financial information showing the estimated first year tax rate for the proposed budget override amount. D. If any amount of the proposed increase will be funded by a levy of taxes in the district, the election prescribed in subsection A of this section shall be held on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November as prescribed by section 16-204, subsection F. If the proposed increase will be fully funded by revenues from other than a levy of taxes, the elections prescribed in subsection A of this section shall be held on any date prescribed by section 16-204. The elections shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in the manner prescribed in article 1 of this chapter, sections 15-422, through 15-423, 15-424 and section 15-426, relating to special elections, except that: 1. The notices required pursuant to section 15-403 shall be posted not less than twenty-five days before the election. 2. Ballots shall be counted pursuant to title 16, chapter 4, article 10. E. If the election is to exceed the revenue control limit and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection P of this section and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within this school district for the year for which adopted and for ____ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed increase in the school district's budget would require an estimated tax rate of $_____________ per $100 of net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's revenue control limit allowed by law. F. If the election is to exceed the revenue control limit and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain: 1. The amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget. 2. A statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection P of this section. 3. The following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by this school district with revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the year for which adopted and for ______ subsequent years and shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state. G. Except as provided in subsection H of this section, the maximum budget increase that may be requested and authorized as provided in subsection E or F of this section or the combination of subsections E and F of this section is fifteen percent of the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-947, subsection A for the any budget year.  If a school district requests an override pursuant to section 15-482 or to continue with a budget override pursuant to section 15-482 for pupils in kindergarten programs and grades one through three that was authorized before December 31, 2008, the maximum budget increase that may be requested and authorized as provided in subsection E or F of this section or the combination of subsections E and F of this section is ten percent of the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-947, subsection A for the any budget year. H. Special budget override provisions for school districts with a student count of less than one hundred fifty-four in kindergarten programs and grades one through eight or with a student count of less than one hundred seventy-six in grades nine through twelve are as follows: 1. The maximum budget increase that may be requested and authorized as provided in subsections E and F of this section is the greater of the amount prescribed in subsection G of this section or a limit computed as follows: (a) For common or unified districts with a student count of less than one hundred fifty-four in kindergarten programs and grades one through eight, the limit computed as prescribed in item (i) or (ii) of this subdivision, whichever is appropriate: (i) Small School   Support Level Weight                  Phase Down Student    Student        for Small Isolated                    Reduction Count     Count Limit    School Districts Base Level    Factor  125 x 1.358 + (0.0005 x     x $ = $ (500  Student Count)) Small Isolated Phase Down     Phase Down              School District Base       Reduction Factor        Elementary Limit $150,000    -  $ = $ (ii) Small School   Support Level Weight                  Phase Down Student    Student        for Small                             Reduction Count     Count Limit    School Districts        Base Level    Factor  125 x 1.278 + (0.0003 x     x $ = $ (500 - Student Count)) Small Phase Down     Phase Down                School District Base       Reduction Factor          Elementary Limit $150,000      $ =  $ (b) For unified or union high school districts with a student count of less than one hundred seventy-six in grades nine through twelve, the limit computed as prescribed in item (i) or (ii) of this subdivision, whichever is appropriate: (i) Small School   Support Level Weight                  Phase Down Student    Student        for Small Isolated                    Reduction Count     Count Limit    School Districts Base Level    Factor  100 x 1.468 + (0.0005 x     x $ = $ __ (500  Student Count)) Small Isolated Phase Down     Phase Down                District Base       Reduction Factor          Secondary Limit $350,000      $ =  $ (ii) Small School   Support Level Weight                  Phase Down Student    Student        for Small                             Reduction Count     Count Limit    School Districts        Base Level_   Factor  100 x  1.398 + (0.0004 x     x $ = $ (500 - Student Count)) Small Phase Down     Phase Down                School District Base       Reduction Factor          Secondary Limit $350,000      $ =  $ (c) If both subdivisions (a) and (b) of this paragraph apply to a unified school district, its limit for the purposes of this paragraph is the combination of its elementary limit and its secondary limit. (d) If only subdivision (a) or (b) of this paragraph applies to a unified school district, the district's limit for the purposes of this paragraph is the sum of the limit computed as provided in subdivision (a) or (b) of this paragraph plus ten percent of the revenue control limit attributable to those grade levels that do not meet the eligibility requirements of this subsection. If a school district budgets monies outside the revenue control limit pursuant to section 15-949, subsection E, the district's limit for the purposes of this paragraph is only the ten percent of the revenue control limit attributable to those grade levels that are not included under section 15-949, subsection E. For the purposes of this subdivision, the revenue control limit is separated into elementary and secondary components based on the weighted student count as provided in section 15-971, subsection B, paragraph 2, subdivision (a). 2. If a school district utilizes this subsection to request an override of more than one year, the ballot shall include an estimate of the amount of the proposed increase in the future years in place of the statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, as prescribed in subsections E and F of this section. 3. Notwithstanding subsection P of this section, the maximum period of an override authorized pursuant to this subsection is five years. 4. Subsection P, paragraphs 1 and 2 of this section do not apply to overrides authorized pursuant to this subsection. I. If the election is to exceed the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-482 and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection Q of this section, and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within this school district for the year for which adopted and for _____ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed increase in the school district's budget that will be funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within this school district would require an estimated tax rate of $__________ per $100 of net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's revenue control limit allowed by law. J. If the election is to exceed the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-482 and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by revenues other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection Q of this section and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by this school district with revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the year for which adopted and for _____ subsequent years and shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state. K. The maximum budget increase that may be requested and authorized as provided in subsection I or J of this section, or a combination of both of these subsections, is five percent of the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-947, subsection A for the any budget year. For a common school district not within a high school district or a common school district within a high school district that offers instruction in high school subjects as provided in section 15-447, five percent of the revenue control limit means five percent of the revenue control limit attributable to the weighted student count in preschool programs for children with disabilities, kindergarten programs and grades one through eight as provided in section 15-971, subsection B.  For a unified school district, five percent of the revenue control limit means five percent of the revenue control limit attributable to the weighted student count in preschool programs for children with disabilities, kindergarten programs and grades one through twelve. For a union high school district, five percent of the revenue control limit means five percent of the revenue control limit attributable to the weighted student count in grades nine through twelve. L. If the election is to exceed district additional assistance and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. An election held pursuant to this subsection shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November. The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property within this school district for the year in which adopted and for _____ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed increase in the school district's budget would require an estimated tax rate of $____________ per $100 of net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's district additional assistance allowed by law. M. If the election is to exceed district additional assistance and if the proposed increase will be fully funded by revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  An election held pursuant to this subsection shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November.  The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget and the following statement: Any budget increase authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by this school district with revenues from other than a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district for the year in which adopted and for ______ subsequent years and shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state. N. If the election is to exceed a combination of the revenue control limit as provided in subsection E or F of this section, the revenue control limit as provided in subsection I or J of this section or district additional assistance as provided in subsection L or M of this section, the ballot shall be prepared so that the voters may vote on each proposed increase separately and shall contain statements required in the same manner as if each proposed increase were submitted separately. O. If the election provides for a levy of taxes on the taxable property within the school district, at least thirty days before the election, the department of revenue shall provide the school district governing board and the county school superintendent with the current net assessed valuation of the school district. The governing board and the county school superintendent shall use the current net assessed valuation of the school district to translate the amount of the proposed dollar increase in the budget of the school district over that allowed by law into a tax rate figure. P. If the voters in a school district vote to adopt a budget in excess of the revenue control limit as provided in subsection E or F of this section, any additional increase shall be included in the aggregate budget limit for each of the years authorized. Any additional increase shall be excluded from the determination of equalization assistance. The school district governing board, however, may levy on the net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes of the property in the school district the additional increase if adopted under subsection E of this section for the period of one year, two years or five through seven years as authorized.  If an additional increase is approved as provided in subsection F of this section, the school district governing board may only use revenues derived from the school district's prior year's maintenance and operation fund ending cash balance to fund the additional increase.  If a budget increase was previously authorized and will be in effect for the at least one budget year or the budget year years and subsequent years, as provided in subsection E or F of this section, the governing board may request a new budget increase as provided in the same subsection under which the prior budget increase was adopted, which shall not exceed the maximum amount allowed under subsection G of this section. If the voters in the school district authorize the new budget increase amount, the existing budget increase no longer is in effect. If the voters in the school district do not authorize the budget increase amount, the existing budget increase remains in effect for the time period for which it was authorized. The maximum additional increase authorized as provided in subsection E or F of this section and the additional increase that is included in the aggregate budget limit is based on a percentage of a school district's revenue control limit in future years, if the budget increase is authorized for more than one year. If the additional increase: 1. Is for two years, the proposed increase in the second year is equal to the initial proposed percentage increase. 2. Is for five years or more, the proposed increase is equal to the initial proposed percentage increase in the following years of the proposed increase, except that in the next to last year it is two-thirds of the initial proposed percentage increase and it is one-third of the initial proposed percentage increase in the last year of the proposed increase. Q. If the voters in a school district vote to adopt a budget in excess of the revenue control limit as provided in subsection I or J of this section, any additional increase shall be included in the aggregate budget limit for each of the years authorized. Any additional increase shall be excluded from the determination of equalization assistance. The school district governing board, however, may levy on the net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes of the property in the school district the additional increase if adopted under subsection I of this section for the period of one year, two years or five through seven years as authorized.  If an additional increase is approved as provided in subsection J of this section, the increase may only be budgeted and expended if sufficient monies are available in the maintenance and operation fund of the school district. If a budget increase was previously authorized and will be in effect for the at least one budget year or the budget year years and subsequent years, as provided in subsection I or J of this section, the governing board may request a new budget increase as provided in the same subsection under which the prior budget increase was adopted that does not exceed the maximum amount permitted under subsection K of this section. If the voters in the school district authorize the new budget increase amount, the existing budget increase no longer is in effect. If the voters in the school district do not authorize the budget increase amount, the existing budget increase remains in effect for the time period for which it was authorized. The maximum additional increase authorized as provided in subsection I or J of this section and the additional increase that is included in the aggregate budget limit is based on a percentage of a school district's revenue control limit in future years, if the budget increase is authorized for more than one year. If the additional increase: 1. Is for two years, the proposed increase in the second year is equal to the initial proposed percentage increase. 2. Is for five years or more, the proposed increase is equal to the initial proposed percentage increase in the following years of the proposed increase, except that in the next to last year it is two-thirds of the initial proposed percentage increase and it is one-third of the initial proposed percentage increase in the last year of the proposed increase. R. If the voters in a school district vote to adopt a budget in excess of district additional assistance as provided in subsection L of this section, any additional increase shall be included in the aggregate budget limit for each of the years authorized. The additional increase shall be excluded from the determination of equalization assistance. The school district governing board, however, may levy on the net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes of the property in the school district the additional increase for the period authorized but not to exceed ten years.  For overrides approved by a vote of the qualified electors of the school district at an election held from and after October 31, 1998, the period of the additional increase prescribed in this subsection shall not exceed seven years for any capital override election. S. If the voters in a school district vote to adopt a budget in excess of district additional assistance as provided in subsection M of this section, any additional increase shall be included in the aggregate budget limit for each of the years authorized. The additional increase shall be excluded from the determination of equalization assistance. The school district governing board may only use revenues derived from the school district's prior year's maintenance and operation fund ending cash balance and capital outlay fund ending cash balance to fund the additional increase for the period authorized but not to exceed ten years. For overrides approved by a vote of the qualified electors of the school district at an election held from and after October 31, 1998, the period of the additional increase prescribed in this subsection shall not exceed seven years for any capital override election. T. In addition to subsections P and S of this section, from the maintenance and operation fund and capital outlay fund ending cash balances, the school district governing board shall first use any available revenues to reduce its primary tax rate to zero and shall use any remaining revenues to fund the additional increase authorized as provided in subsections F and M of this section. U. If the voters in a school district disapprove the proposed budget, the alternate budget that, except for any budget increase authorized by a prior election, does not include an increase in the budget in excess of the amount provided in section 15-905 shall be adopted by the governing board as provided in section 15-905. V. The governing board may request that any override election be cancelled if any change in chapter 9 of this title changes the amount of the aggregate budget limit as provided in section 15-905.  The request to cancel the override election shall be made to the county school superintendent at least eighty days before the date of the scheduled override election. W. For any election conducted pursuant to subsection L or M of this section: 1. The ballot shall include the following statement in addition to any other statement required by this section: The capital improvements that are proposed to be funded through this override election are to exceed the state standards and are in addition to monies provided by the state. ___________ school district is proposing to increase its budget by $__________ to fund capital improvements over and above those funded by the state. Under the students first capital funding system, _________ school district is entitled to state monies for new construction and renovation of school buildings in accordance with state law. 2. The ballot shall contain the words "budget increase, yes" and "budget increase, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. 3. At least eighty-five days before the election, the school district shall submit proposed ballot language to the director of the Arizona legislative council. The director of the Arizona legislative council shall review the proposed ballot language to determine whether the proposed ballot language complies with this section. If the director of the Arizona legislative council determines that the proposed ballot language does not comply with this section, the director, within ten calendar days after receiving the proposed ballot language, shall notify the school district of the director's objections, and the school district shall resubmit revised ballot language to the director for approval. X. If the voters approve the budget increase pursuant to subsection L or M of this section, the school district shall not use the override proceeds for any purposes other than the proposed capital improvements listed in the informational pamphlet, except that up to ten percent of the override proceeds may be used for general capital expenses, including cost overruns of proposed capital improvements. Y. Each school district that currently increases its budget pursuant to this section shall hold a public meeting each year between September 1 and October 31 at which an update of the programs or capital improvements financed through the override is discussed and at which the public is allowed an opportunity to comment and: 1. If the increase is pursuant to subsection L or M of this section, at a minimum, the update shall include the progress of capital improvements financed through the override, a comparison of the current status and the original projections on the construction of capital improvements, the costs of capital improvements and the costs of capital improvements in progress or completed since the prior meeting and the future capital plans of the school district. The school district shall include in the public meeting a discussion of the school district's use of state capital aid and voter-approved bonding in funding capital improvements, if any. 2. If the increase is pursuant to subsection E, F, I or J of this section, the update shall include at a minimum the amount expended in the previous fiscal year and the amount included in the current budget for each of the purposes listed in the informational pamphlet prescribed by subsection B of this section. Z. If a budget in excess of district additional assistance was previously adopted by the voters in a school district and will be in effect for the at least one budget year or the budget year years and subsequent years, as provided in subsection L or M of this section, the governing board may request an additional budget in excess of district additional assistance. If the voters in a school district authorize the additional budget in excess of district additional assistance, the existing district additional assistance budget increase remains in effect. AA. Notwithstanding any other law, the maximum budget increase that may be authorized pursuant to subsection L or M of this section is ten percent of the school district's revenue control limit. BB. If the election is to continue to exceed the revenue control limit and if the proposed override will be fully funded by a continuation of a levy of taxes on the taxable property in the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget override continuation, yes" and "budget override continuation, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed continuation of the budget increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection P of this section and the following statement: Any budget increase continuation authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property in this school district for the year for which adopted and for _______ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed continuation of the increase in the school district's budget would require an estimated continuation of a tax rate of $______________ per $100 of assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's revenue control limit allowed by law. CC. If the election is to continue to exceed the revenue control limit as provided in section 15-482 and if the proposed override will be fully funded by a continuation of a levy of taxes on the taxable property in the school district, the ballot shall contain the words "budget override continuation, yes" and "budget override continuation, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice.  The ballot shall also contain the amount of the proposed continuation of the budget increase of the proposed budget over the alternate budget, a statement that the amount of the proposed increase will be based on a percentage of the school district's revenue control limit in future years, if applicable, as provided in subsection P of this section and the following statement: Any budget increase continuation authorized by this election shall be entirely funded by a levy of taxes on the taxable property in this school district for the year for which adopted and for ______ subsequent years, shall not be realized from monies furnished by the state and shall not be subject to the limitation on taxes specified in article IX, section 18, Constitution of Arizona. Based on the current net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes, to fund the proposed continuation of the increase in the school district's budget would require an estimated continuation of a tax rate of $______________ per $100 of net assessed valuation used for secondary property tax purposes and is in addition to the school district's tax rate that will be levied to fund the school district's revenue control limit allowed by law. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 15-901, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-901. Definitions A. In this title, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Average daily membership" means the total enrollment of fractional students and full-time students, minus withdrawals, of each school day through the first one hundred days or two hundred days in session, as applicable, for the current year. For the purposes of this paragraph, "withdrawals" means students who are formally withdrawn from schools or students who are absent for ten consecutive school days, except for excused absences identified by the department of education. For computation purposes, a student who is absent for nine or fewer consecutive school days, including the last day of the school year, is not a withdrawal and may not be subtracted from the total enrollment of fractional students and full-time students. For the purposes of this section, school districts and charter schools shall report student absence data to the department of education at least once every sixty days in session.  For computation purposes, the effective date of withdrawal shall be retroactive to the last day of actual attendance of the student or excused absence. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this subsection in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (a) "Fractional student" means: (i) For common schools, a preschool child who is enrolled in a program for preschool children with disabilities of at least three hundred sixty minutes each week that meets at least two hundred sixteen hours over the minimum number of days or a kindergarten student who is at least five years of age before January 1 of the school year and enrolled in a school kindergarten program that meets at least three hundred fifty-six hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section. In computing the average daily membership, preschool children with disabilities and kindergarten students shall be counted as one-half of a full-time student. For common schools, a part-time student is a student enrolled for less than the total time for a full-time student as defined in this section. A part-time common school student shall be counted as one-fourth, one-half or three-fourths of a full-time student if the student is enrolled in an instructional program that is at least one-fourth, one-half or three-fourths of the time a full-time student is enrolled as defined in subdivision (b) of this paragraph.  The hours in which a student is scheduled to attend a common school during the regular school day shall be included in the calculation of the average daily membership for that student. (ii) For high schools, a part-time student who is enrolled in less than four subjects that count toward graduation as defined by the state board of education, each of which, if taught each school day for the minimum number of days required in a school year, would meet a minimum of one hundred twenty-three hours a year, or the equivalent, in a recognized high school. The average daily membership of a part-time high school student shall be 0.75 if the student is enrolled in an instructional program of three subjects that meet at least five hundred forty hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section. The average daily membership of a part-time high school student shall be 0.5 if the student is enrolled in an instructional program of two subjects that meet at least three hundred sixty hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section. The average daily membership of a part-time high school student shall be 0.25 if the student is enrolled in an instructional program of one subject that meets at least one hundred eighty hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section. The hours in which a student is scheduled to attend a high school during the regular school day shall be included in the calculation of the average daily membership for that student. (b) "Full-time student" means: (i) For common schools, a student who is at least six years of age before January 1 of a school year, who has not graduated from the highest grade taught in the school district and who is regularly enrolled in a course of study required by the state board of education. First, second and third grade students or ungraded group B children with disabilities who are at least five, but under six, years of age by September 1 must be enrolled in an instructional program that meets for a total of at least seven hundred twelve hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section. Fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh and eighth grade students must be enrolled in an instructional program that meets for a total of at least eight hundred ninety hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section, including the equivalent number of instructional hours for schools that operate on a one hundred forty-four-day school year. The hours in which a student is scheduled to attend a common school during the regular school day shall be included in the calculation of the average daily membership for that student. (ii) For high schools, a student who has not graduated from the highest grade taught in the school district and who is enrolled in at least an instructional program of four or more subjects that count toward graduation as defined by the state board of education, each of which, if taught each school day for the minimum number of days required in a school year, would meet a minimum of one hundred twenty-three hours a year, or the equivalent, that meets for a total of at least seven hundred twenty hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the instructional hours prescribed in this section in a recognized high school. A full-time student shall not be counted more than once for computation of average daily membership. The average daily membership of a full-time high school student shall be 1.0 if the student is enrolled in at least four subjects that meet at least seven hundred twenty hours for a one hundred eighty-day school year, or the equivalent instructional hours prescribed in this section. The hours in which a student is scheduled to attend a high school during the regular school day shall be included in the calculation of the average daily membership for that student. (iii) If a child who has not reached five years of age before September 1 of the current school year is admitted to kindergarten and repeats kindergarten in the following school year, a school district or charter school is not eligible to receive basic state aid on behalf of that child during the child's second year of kindergarten. If a child who has not reached five years of age before September 1 of the current school year is admitted to kindergarten but does not remain enrolled, a school district or charter school may receive a portion of basic state aid on behalf of that child in the subsequent year. A school district or charter school may charge tuition for any child who is ineligible for basic state aid pursuant to this item. (iv) Except as otherwise provided by law, for a full-time high school student who is concurrently enrolled in two school districts or two charter schools, the average daily membership shall not exceed 1.0. (v) Except as otherwise provided by law, for any student who is concurrently enrolled in a school district and a charter school, the average daily membership shall be apportioned between the school district and the charter school and shall not exceed 1.0. The apportionment shall be based on the percentage of total time that the student is enrolled in or in attendance at the school district and the charter school. (vi) Except as otherwise provided by law, for any student who is concurrently enrolled, pursuant to section 15-808, in a school district and Arizona online instruction or a charter school and Arizona online instruction, the average daily membership shall be apportioned between the school district and Arizona online instruction or the charter school and Arizona online instruction and shall not exceed 1.0. The apportionment shall be based on the percentage of total time that the student is enrolled in or in attendance at the school district and Arizona online instruction or the charter school and Arizona online instruction. (vii) For homebound or hospitalized, a student receiving at least four hours of instruction per week. (c) "Regular school day" means the regularly scheduled class periods intended for instructional purposes. Instructional purposes may include core subjects, elective subjects, lunch, study halls, music instruction and other classes that advance the academic instruction of pupils. Instructional purposes do not include athletic practices or extracurricular clubs and activities. 2. "Budget year" means the a fiscal year that is both: (a) A fiscal year for which the school district is budgeting. and (b) One of the two fiscal years that immediately follows follow the current year. 3. "Common school district" means a political subdivision of this state offering instruction to students in programs for preschool children with disabilities and kindergarten programs and either: (a) Grades one through eight. (b) Grades one through nine pursuant to section 15-447.01. 4. "Current year" means the fiscal year in which a school district is operating. 5. "Daily attendance" means: (a) For common schools, days in which a pupil: (i) Of a kindergarten program or ungraded, but not group B children with disabilities, who is at least five, but under six, years of age by September 1 attends at least three-quarters of the instructional time scheduled for the day. If the total instruction time scheduled for the year is at least three hundred fifty-six hours but is less than seven hundred twelve hours, such attendance shall be counted as one-half day of attendance. If the instructional time scheduled for the year is at least six hundred ninety-two hours, "daily attendance" means days in which a pupil attends at least one-half of the instructional time scheduled for the day. Such attendance shall be counted as one-half day of attendance.  A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this item in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (ii) Of the first, second or third grades attends more than three-quarters of the instructional time scheduled for the day. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this item in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (iii) Of the fourth, fifth or sixth grades attends more than three-quarters of the instructional time scheduled for the day, except as provided in section 15-797. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this item in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (iv) Of the seventh or eighth grades attends more than three-quarters of the instructional time scheduled for the day, except as provided in section 15-797. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this item in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (b) For common schools, the attendance of a pupil at three-quarters or less of the instructional time scheduled for the day shall be counted as follows, except as provided in section 15-797 and except that attendance for a fractional student shall not exceed the pupil's fractional membership: (i) If attendance for all pupils in the school is based on quarter days, the attendance of a pupil shall be counted as one-fourth of a day's attendance for each one-fourth of full-time instructional time attended.  A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this item in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (ii) If attendance for all pupils in the school is based on half days, the attendance of at least three-quarters of the instructional time scheduled for the day shall be counted as a full day's attendance and attendance at a minimum of one-half but less than three-quarters of the instructional time scheduled for the day equals one-half day of attendance. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this item in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (c) For common schools, the attendance of a preschool child with disabilities shall be counted as one-fourth day's attendance for each thirty-six minutes of attendance, except as provided in paragraph 1, subdivision (a), item (i) of this subsection for children with disabilities up to a maximum of three hundred sixty minutes each week. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this subdivision in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (d) For high schools, the attendance of a pupil shall not be counted as a full day unless the pupil is actually and physically in attendance and enrolled in and carrying four subjects, each of which, if taught each school day for the minimum number of days required in a school year, would meet a minimum of one hundred twenty-three hours a year, or the equivalent, that count toward graduation in a recognized high school except as provided in section 15-797 and subdivision (e) of this paragraph. Attendance of a pupil carrying less than the load prescribed shall be prorated. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this subdivision in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (e) For high schools, the attendance of a pupil may be counted as one-fourth of a day's attendance for each sixty minutes of instructional time in a subject that counts toward graduation, except that attendance for a pupil shall not exceed the pupil's full or fractional membership. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this subdivision in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (f) For homebound or hospitalized, a full day of attendance may be counted for each day during a week in which the student receives at least four hours of instruction. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this subdivision in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. (g) For school districts that maintain school for an approved year-round school year operation, attendance shall be based on a computation, as prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction, of the one hundred eighty days' equivalency or two hundred days' equivalency, as applicable, of instructional time as approved by the superintendent of public instruction during which each pupil is enrolled. A school district or charter school may satisfy any of the time and hours requirements prescribed in this subdivision in any manner prescribed in the school district's or charter school's instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. 6. "Daily route mileage" means the sum of: (a) The total number of miles driven daily by all buses of a school district while transporting eligible students from their residence to the school of attendance and from the school of attendance to their residence on scheduled routes approved by the superintendent of public instruction. (b) The total number of miles driven daily on routes approved by the superintendent of public instruction for which a private party, a political subdivision or a common or a contract carrier is reimbursed for bringing an eligible student from the place of the student's residence to a school transportation pickup point or to the school of attendance and from the school transportation scheduled return point or from the school of attendance to the student's residence. Daily route mileage includes the total number of miles necessary to drive to transport eligible students from and to their residence as provided in this paragraph. 7. "District support level" means the base support level plus the transportation support level. 8. "Eligible students" means: (a) Students who are transported by or for a school district and who qualify as full-time students or fractional students, except students for whom transportation is paid by another school district or a county school superintendent, and: (i) For common school students, whose place of actual residence within the school district is more than one mile from the school facility of attendance or students who are admitted pursuant to section 15-816.01 and who meet the economic eligibility requirements established under the national school lunch and child nutrition acts (42 United States Code sections 1751 through 1793) for free or reduced-price lunches and whose actual place of residence outside the school district boundaries is more than one mile from the school facility of attendance. (ii) For high school students, whose place of actual residence within the school district is more than one and one-half miles from the school facility of attendance or students who are admitted pursuant to section 15-816.01 and who meet the economic eligibility requirements established under the national school lunch and child nutrition acts (42 United States Code sections 1751 through 1793) for free or reduced-price lunches and whose actual place of residence outside the school district boundaries is more than one and one-half miles from the school facility of attendance. (b) Kindergarten students, for purposes of computing the number of eligible students under subdivision (a), item (i) of this paragraph, shall be counted as full-time students, notwithstanding any other provision of law. (c) Children with disabilities, as defined by section 15-761, who are transported by or for the school district or who are admitted pursuant to chapter 8, article 1.1 of this title and who qualify as full-time students or fractional students regardless of location or residence within the school district or children with disabilities whose transportation is required by the pupil's individualized education program. (d) Students whose residence is outside the school district and who are transported within the school district on the same basis as students who reside in the school district. 9. "Enrolled" or "enrollment" means that a pupil is currently registered in the school district. 10. "GDP price deflator" means the average of the four implicit price deflators for the gross domestic product reported by the United States department of commerce for the four quarters of the calendar year. 11. "High school district" means a political subdivision of this state offering instruction to students for grades nine through twelve or that portion of the budget of a common school district that is allocated to teaching high school subjects with permission of the state board of education. 12. "Instructional hours" or "instructional time" means hours or time spent pursuant to an instructional time model adopted under section 15-901.08. 13. "Revenue control limit" means the base revenue control limit plus the transportation revenue control limit. 14. "Student count" means average daily membership as prescribed in this subsection for the fiscal year before the current year, except that for the purpose of budget preparation student count means average daily membership as prescribed in this subsection for the current year. 15. "Submit electronically" means submitted in a format and in a manner prescribed by the department of education. 16. "Total bus mileage" means the total number of miles driven by all buses of a school district during the school year. 17. "Total students transported" means all eligible students transported from their place of residence to a school transportation pickup point or to the school of attendance and from the school of attendance or from the school transportation scheduled return point to their place of residence. 18. "Unified school district" means a political subdivision of this state offering instruction to students in programs for preschool children with disabilities and kindergarten programs and grades one through twelve. B. In this title, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Base" means the revenue level per student count specified by the legislature. 2. "Base level" means the following amounts plus the percentage increase to the base level as provided in section 15-902.04: (a) For fiscal year 2023-2024, $4,914.71. (b) For fiscal year 2024-2025, $5,013.00. (c) For fiscal year 2025-2026, $5,113.26. 3. "Base revenue control limit" means the base revenue control limit computed as provided in section 15-944. 4. "Base support level" means the base support level as provided in section 15-943. 5. "Certified teacher" means a person who is certified as a teacher pursuant to the rules adopted by the state board of education, who renders direct and personal services to schoolchildren in the form of instruction related to the school district's educational course of study and who is paid from the maintenance and operation section of the budget. 6. "DD" means programs for children with developmental delays who are at least three years of age but under ten years of age.  A preschool child who is categorized under this paragraph is not eligible to receive funding pursuant to section 15-943, paragraph 2, subdivision (b). 7. "ED, MIID, SLD, SLI and OHI" means programs for children with emotional disabilities, mild intellectual disabilities, a specific learning disability, a speech/language impairment and other health impairments. A preschool child who is categorized as SLI under this paragraph is not eligible to receive funding pursuant to section 15-943, paragraph 2, subdivision (b). 8. "ED-P" means programs for children with emotional disabilities who are enrolled in private special education programs as prescribed in section 15-765, subsection D, paragraph 1 or in an intensive school district program as provided in section 15-765, subsection D, paragraph 2. 9. "ELL" means English learners who do not speak English or whose native language is not English, who are not currently able to perform ordinary classroom work in English and who are enrolled in an English language education program pursuant to sections 15-751, 15-752 and 15-753. 10. "FRPL" means students who meet the eligibility requirements established under the national school lunch and child nutrition acts (42 United States Code sections 1751 through 1793) for free or reduced-price lunches, or an equivalent measure recognized for participating in the federal free and reduced-price lunch program and other school programs dependent on a poverty measure, including the community eligibility provision for which free and reduced-price lunch data is not available. 11. "Full-time equivalent certified teacher" or "FTE certified teacher" means for a certified teacher the following: (a) If employed full time full-time as defined in section 15-501, 1.00. (b) If employed less than full time full-time, multiply 1.00 by the percentage of a full school day, or its equivalent, or a full class load, or its equivalent, for which the teacher is employed as determined by the governing board. 12. "G" means educational programs for gifted pupils who score at or above the ninety-seventh percentile, based on national norms, on a test adopted by the state board of education. 13. "Group A" means educational programs for career exploration, a specific learning disability, an emotional disability, a mild intellectual disability, remedial education, a speech/language impairment, developmental delay, homebound pupils, bilingual pupils and pupils with other health impairments. 14. "Group B" means educational improvements for pupils in kindergarten programs and grades one through three, educational programs for autism, a hearing impairment, a moderate intellectual disability, multiple disabilities, multiple disabilities with severe sensory impairment, orthopedic impairments, preschool severe delay, a severe intellectual disability and emotional disabilities for school age pupils enrolled in private special education programs or in school district programs for children with severe disabilities or visual impairment, English learners enrolled in a program to promote English language proficiency pursuant to section 15-752 and students who meet the eligibility requirements established under the national school lunch and child nutrition acts (42 United States Code sections 1751 through 1793) for free or reduced-price lunches, or an equivalent measure recognized for participating in the federal free and reduced-price lunch program and other school programs dependent on a poverty measure, including the community eligibility provision for which free and reduced-price lunch data is not available. 15. "HI" means programs for pupils with hearing impairment. 16. "Homebound" or "hospitalized" means a pupil who is capable of profiting from academic instruction but is unable to attend school due to illness, disease, accident or other health conditions, who has been examined by a competent medical doctor and who is certified by that doctor as being unable to attend regular classes for a period of not less than at least three school months or a pupil who is capable of profiting from academic instruction but is unable to attend school regularly due to chronic or acute health problems, who has been examined by a competent medical doctor and who is certified by that doctor as being unable to attend regular classes for intermittent periods of time totaling three school months during a school year. The medical certification shall state the general medical condition, such as illness, disease or chronic health condition, that is the reason that the pupil is unable to attend school. Homebound or hospitalized includes a student who is unable to attend school for a period of less than three months due to a pregnancy if a competent medical doctor, after an examination, certifies that the student is unable to attend regular classes due to risk to the pregnancy or to the student's health. 17. "K-3" means kindergarten programs and grades one through three. 18. "K-3 reading" means reading programs for pupils in kindergarten programs and grades one, two and three. 19. "MD-R, A-R and SID-R" means resource programs for pupils with multiple disabilities, autism and severe intellectual disability. 20. "MD-SC, A-SC and SID-SC" means self-contained programs for pupils with multiple disabilities, autism and severe intellectual disability. 21. "MD-SSI" means a program for pupils with multiple disabilities with severe sensory impairment. 22. "MOID" means programs for pupils with moderate intellectual disability. 23. "OI-R" means a resource program for pupils with orthopedic impairments. 24. "OI-SC" means a self-contained program for pupils with orthopedic impairments. 25. "PSD" means preschool programs for children with disabilities as provided in section 15-771. 26. "P-SD" means programs for children who meet the definition of preschool severe delay as provided in section 15-771. 27. "Qualifying tax rate" means the qualifying tax rate specified in section 15-971 applied to the assessed valuation used for primary property taxes. 28. "Small isolated school district" means a school district that meets all of the following: (a) Has a student count of fewer than six hundred in kindergarten programs and grades one through eight or grades nine through twelve. (b) Contains no school that is fewer than thirty miles by the most reasonable route from another school, or, if road conditions and terrain make the driving slow or hazardous, fifteen miles from another school that teaches one or more of the same grades and is operated by another school district in this state. (c) Is designated as a small isolated school district by the superintendent of public instruction. 29. "Small school district" means a school district that meets all of the following: (a) Has a student count of fewer than six hundred in kindergarten programs and grades one through eight or grades nine through twelve. (b) Contains at least one school that is fewer than thirty miles by the most reasonable route from another school that teaches one or more of the same grades and is operated by another school district in this state. (c) Is designated as a small school district by the superintendent of public instruction. 30. "Transportation revenue control limit" means the transportation revenue control limit computed as prescribed in section 15-946. 31. "Transportation support level" means the support level for pupil transportation operating expenses as provided in section 15-945. 32. "VI" means programs for pupils with visual impairments. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 15-905, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-905. School district budgets; notice; adoption; aggregate budget limit; summary; adjustments; impact aid fund; definition A. Not later than July 5 of each year or not later than the publication of notice of the public hearing and board meeting as required by this section, the governing board of each school district shall prepare and furnish to the superintendent of public instruction and the county school superintendent, unless waived by the county school superintendent, a proposed budget in an electronic format for the budget year next two fiscal years, which shall contain the information and be in the form as provided by the department of education.  The proposed budget shall include the following: 1. The total amount of revenues from all sources that was necessary to meet the school district's budget for the current year. 2. The total amount of revenues by source that will be necessary to meet the proposed budget of the school district for each budget year, excluding property taxes. The governing board shall prepare the proposed budget and a summary of the proposed budget. Both documents shall be kept on file at the school district office and shall be made available to the public on request. Not later than July 5 of each year or not later than the publication of notice of the public hearing and board meeting required by this subsection, the governing board shall submit the proposed budget to the department of education, which shall prominently display this information about that school district on the website maintained by the department. If the school district maintains a website, the school district shall post a link to the website of the department of education where this information about the school district is posted.  The auditor general in conjunction with the department of education shall prescribe the form of the summary of the proposed budget for use by governing boards. School district governing boards may include in the proposed budget any items or amounts that are authorized by legislation filed with the secretary of state and that will become effective during the each budget year. If subsequent events prevent the legislation from becoming effective, school district governing boards must reduce their budgets by the amounts budgeted pursuant to the legislation that did not become effective. B. The governing board of each school district shall prepare a notice fixing a time not later than July 15 and designating a public place within each school district at which a public hearing and board meeting shall be held. The governing board shall present the proposed budget for consideration of the residents and the taxpayers of the school district at that hearing and meeting. C. The governing board of each school district shall publish or mail, before the hearing and meeting, a copy of the proposed budget or the summary of the proposed budget and a notice of the public hearing and board meeting not later than ten days before the meeting. The proposed budget and the summary of the proposed budget shall contain the percentage of increase or decrease in each budget category of the proposed budget as compared to each category of the budget for the current year. Notification shall be either by publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the school district in which the size of the newspaper print is at least eight-point type, by electronic transmission of the information to the department of education for posting on the department's website or by mailing the information to each household in the school district.  The cost of publication, website posting or mailing shall be a charge against the school district. The publisher's affidavit of publication shall be filed by the governing board with the superintendent of public instruction within thirty days after publication.  If the budget or proposed budget and notice are posted on a website maintained by the department of education or mailed, the board shall file an affidavit with the superintendent of public instruction within thirty days after the mailing or the date that the information is posted on the website. If a truth in taxation notice and hearing is required under section 15-905.01, the governing board may combine the notice and hearing under this section with the truth in taxation notice and hearing. D. At the time and place fixed in the notice, the governing board shall hold the public hearing and present the proposed budget to the persons attending the hearing. On request of any person, the governing board shall explain the budget, and any resident or taxpayer of the school district may protest the inclusion of any item. A governing board member who has a substantial interest, as defined in section 38-502, in a specific item in the school district budget shall refrain from voting on the specific item. A governing board member may participate without creating a conflict of interest in adopting a final budget even though the member may have substantial interest in specific items included in the budget. E. Immediately following the public hearing the president shall call to order the governing board meeting for the purpose of adopting the budget. The governing board shall adopt the budget, which shall not exceed the general budget limit or the unrestricted capital budget limit, making such deductions as it the governing board sees fit but making no additions to the proposed budget total for maintenance and operations or capital outlay, and shall enter the budget as adopted in its minutes. Not later than July 18 of each year, the budget as finally adopted shall be submitted electronically to the superintendent of public instruction. Not later than July 18 of each year, the governing board shall submit the budget as finally adopted to the department of education, which shall prominently display this information about that school district on the website maintained by the department. If the school district maintains a website, the school district shall post a link to the website of the department of education where this information about the school district is posted. On or before October 30 of each year, the superintendent of public instruction shall review the budget and notify the governing board if the budget exceeds the general budget limit or the unrestricted capital budget limit. The governing board shall revise the budget as follows: 1. If the governing board receives notification that the budget exceeds the general budget limit or the unrestricted capital budget limit by one percent of the general budget limit, it shall adopt on or before December 15, after it gives notice and holds a public meeting in a similar manner as provided in subsections C and D of this section, a revised budget for the current year, which shall not exceed the general budget limit or the unrestricted capital budget limit. 2. If the governing board receives notification that the budget exceeds the general budget limit or the unrestricted capital budget limit by less than the amount prescribed in paragraph 1 of this subsection, the governing board shall adjust the budget and expenditures so as not to exceed the general budget limit or the unrestricted capital budget limit for the current year. 3. Not later than December 18, the budget as revised shall be submitted electronically to the superintendent of public instruction. Procedures for adjusting expenditures or revising the budget shall be as prescribed in the uniform system of financial records. F. The governing board of each school district may budget for expenditures within the school district budget as follows: 1. Amounts within the general budget limit, as provided in section 15-947, subsection C, may only be budgeted in the following sections of the budget: (a) The maintenance and operation section. (b) The capital outlay section. 2. Amounts within the unrestricted capital budget limit, as provided in section 15-947, subsection D, may only be budgeted in the unrestricted capital outlay subsection of the budget. Monies received pursuant to the unrestricted capital budget limit shall be placed in the unrestricted capital outlay fund. The monies in the fund are not subject to reversion. G. The governing board may authorize the expenditure of monies budgeted within the maintenance and operation section of the budget for any subsection within the section in excess of amounts specified in the adopted budget only by action taken at a public meeting of the governing board and if the expenditures for all subsections of the section do not exceed the amount budgeted as provided in this section. H. The aggregate budget limit for each budget year is the sum of the following: 1. The general budget limit as determined in section 15-947 for the each budget year. 2. The unrestricted capital budget limit as determined in section 15-947 for the each budget year. 3. Federal assistance, excluding title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 monies. I. School districts that overestimated tuition revenues as provided in section 15-947, subsection C, paragraph 2 shall adjust the general budget limit and expenditures based on tuition revenues for attendance of nonresident pupils during the current fiscal year. School districts that underestimated tuition revenues may adjust their budgets before May 15 based on tuition revenues for attendance of nonresident pupils during the current fiscal year. School districts that overestimated revenues as provided in section 15-947, subsection C, paragraph 2, subdivision (a), items (iii), (iv) and (v) and subdivision (c) shall adjust the general budget limit and expenditures based on actual revenues during the current fiscal year. School districts that underestimated such revenues may adjust their budgets before May 15 based on actual revenues during the current fiscal year. Procedures for completing adjustments shall be as prescribed in the uniform system of financial records.  Not later than May 18, the budget as adjusted shall be submitted electronically to the superintendent of public instruction. J. A common school district not within a high school district whose estimated tuition charge for high school pupils exceeds the actual tuition charge for high school pupils shall adjust the general budget limit and expenditures based on the actual tuition charge.  Not later than May 18, the budget as adjusted shall be submitted electronically to the superintendent of public instruction. A common school district not within a high school district whose estimated tuition charge for high school pupils is less than the actual tuition charge for high school pupils may adjust its budget before May 15 based on the actual tuition charge.  Procedures for completing adjustments shall be as prescribed in the uniform system of financial records. If the adjusted general budget limit requires an adjustment of state aid and if the adjustment to state aid is not made in the current year, the superintendent of public instruction shall adjust by August 15 of the succeeding fiscal year the apportionment of state aid to the school district to correct any overpayment or underpayment of state aid received during the current year. K. The governing board may include title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance allocated for children with disabilities, children with specific learning disabilities, children residing on Indian lands and children residing within the boundaries of an accommodation school that is located on a military reservation and that is classified as a heavily impacted local educational agency pursuant to 20 United States Code section 7703, which is in addition to basic assistance when determining the general budget limit as prescribed in section 15-947, subsection C. The increase in the general budget limit for children residing within the boundaries of an accommodation school that is located on a military reservation and that is classified as a heavily impacted local education agency shall equal the dollar amount calculated pursuant to 20 United States Code section 7703(b)(2). The governing board may adjust before May 15 the budget for the current year based on any adjustments that result in increases over the amount estimated by the superintendent of public instruction for title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance for such pupils for the fiscal year preceding the current year. The governing board shall adjust before May 15 the budget for the current year based on any adjustments that result in decreases in the amount estimated by the superintendent of public instruction for title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance for such pupils for the fiscal year preceding the current year. Not later than May 18, the budget as adjusted shall be submitted electronically to the superintendent of public instruction.  Procedures for complying with this subsection shall be as prescribed in the uniform system of financial records. L. The department of education shall notify the state board of education if expenditures by any school district exceed the general budget limit prescribed in section 15-947, subsection C, the unrestricted capital budget limit, the school plant fund limits prescribed in section 15-1102, subsection B, the maintenance and operation section of the budget or the capital outlay section of the budget. If the expenditures of any school district exceed these limits or sections of the budget without authorization as provided in section 15-907, and if the state board of education determines that the equalization assistance for education received by the school district as provided in section 15-971 does not conform with statutory requirements, the state board of education shall reduce the state aid for equalization assistance for education for the school district computed as provided in section 15-971 during the fiscal year subsequent to the fiscal year in which the excess equalization assistance for education was received by an amount equal to the excess equalization assistance for education, except that in case of hardship to the school district, the superintendent of public instruction may approve reductions partly in the first subsequent year and partly in the second subsequent year. If the state board of education determines that the equalization assistance for education received by the school district conforms with statutory requirements, the state board of education shall not reduce the district's equalization assistance for education pursuant to this subsection but the district shall reduce the budget limits as required in subsection M of this section. A school district that disagrees with the department of education's determination regarding an excess expenditure under this subsection may request a hearing before the state board of education. M. The governing board of a school district shall reduce the general budget limit or the unrestricted capital budget limit for the year subsequent to the year in which the expenditures were in excess of the applicable limit or section of the budget by the amount determined in subsection L of this section, except that in case of hardship to the school district, the superintendent of public instruction may approve reductions partly in the first subsequent year and partly in the second subsequent year. The reduction in the limit is applicable to each school district that has exceeded the general budget limit, the unrestricted capital budget limit or a section of the budget even if the reduction exceeds the state aid for equalization assistance for education for the school district. N. Except as provided in section 15-916, no a school district may not make an expenditure shall be made by any school district for a purpose not included in the budget or in excess of the aggregate budget limit prescribed in this section, except that if no the school district has not adopted a budget has been adopted, from July 1 to July 15 the governing board may make expenditures if the total of the expenditures does not exceed ten percent of the prior year's aggregate budget limit. the school district shall include any expenditures made from July 1 to July 15 and before the adoption of the budget shall be included in the total expenditures for the current year.  No A school DISTRICT may not make an expenditure shall be made and no or incur or create a debt, obligation or liability shall be incurred or created in any year for any purpose itemized in the budget in excess of the amount specified for the item irrespective of whether the school district at any time has received or has on hand funds in excess of those required to meet the expenditures, debts, obligations and liabilities provided for under the budget except expenditures from cash controlled funds as defined by the uniform system of financial records and except as provided in section 15-907 and subsection G of this section. This subsection does not prohibit any school district from prepaying insurance premiums, magazine subscriptions or officiating services, or from prepaying any item that is normally prepaid in order to procure the service or to receive a discounted price for the service, as prescribed by the uniform system of financial records. O. The governing board of a school district that is classified as a heavily impacted school district having twenty percent or more pupils pursuant to 20 United States Code section 238(d)1(A) may determine its eligibility to increase the amount that may be included in determining the general budget limit as provided in subsection K of this section and may increase the amount as follows: 1. For fiscal year 1988-1989: (a) Multiply $1,094 by the number of children with disabilities or children with specific learning disabilities, excluding children who also reside on Indian lands, reported to the division of impact aid, United States department of education in the district's application for fiscal year 1987-1988. (b) Multiply $547 by the number of children residing on Indian lands, excluding children who have disabilities or also have specific learning disabilities, reported to the division of impact aid, United States department of education in the district's application for fiscal year 1987-1988. (c) Multiply $1,914 by the number of children residing on Indian lands who have disabilities or also have specific learning disabilities reported to the division of impact aid, United States department of education in the district's application for fiscal year 1987-1988. (d) Add the amounts determined in subdivisions (a) through (c) of this paragraph. (e) If the amount of title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance as provided in subsection K of this section is less than the sum determined in subdivision (d) of this paragraph, the district is eligible to use this subsection. 2. For budget years after 1988-1989, use paragraph 1 of this subsection, but increase each dollar amount by the growth rate for that year as prescribed by law, subject to appropriation and use the number of children reported in the appropriate category for the current fiscal year. 3. If the district is eligible to use this subsection, subtract the amount of title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance determined in subsection K of this section from the sum determined in paragraph 1, subdivision (d) of this subsection. The difference is the increase in the amount that may be included in determining the general budget limit as provided in subsection K of this section, if including this amount does not increase the district's primary tax rate for the budget year. If the amount of title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance determined in subsection K of this section is adjusted for the current year, the increase determined in this paragraph shall be recomputed using the adjusted amount and the recomputed increase shall be reported to the department of education by May 15 on a form prescribed by the department of education. 4. If a district uses this subsection, the district is not required to adjust its budget for the current year based on adjustments in the estimated amount of title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance as provided in subsection K of this section. P. A school district, except for an accommodation school, that applies for title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance during the current year may budget an amount for title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 administrative costs for the each budget year. The amount budgeted for title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 administrative costs is exempt from the revenue control limit and may not exceed an amount determined for the budgeted each budget year as follows: 1. Determine the minimum cost. The minimum cost for fiscal year 1990-1991 is $2,343. For fiscal year 1991-1992 and thereafter, the minimum cost is the minimum cost for the prior year increased by the growth rate as prescribed by law, subject to appropriation. 2. Determine the hourly rate. The hourly rate for fiscal year 1990-1991 is $9.38. For fiscal year 1991-1992 and thereafter, the hourly rate is the hourly rate for the prior year increased by the growth rate as prescribed by law, subject to appropriation. 3. Determine the title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 revenues available by subtracting the amount of title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance used to increase the general budget limit as provided in subsections K and O of this section for the current fiscal year from the total amount of title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 revenues received in the current fiscal year. 4. Determine the total number of administrative hours as follows: (a) Determine the sum of the following: (i) 1.00 hours for each high impact pupil who is not a person with a disability or does not have specific learning disabilities. (ii) 1.25 hours for each high impact pupil who is a person with a disability or has specific learning disabilities. (iii) 0.25 hours for each low impact pupil who is not a person with a disability or does not have specific learning disabilities. (iv) 0.31 hours for each low impact pupil who is a person with a disability or has specific learning disabilities. (b) For the purposes of this paragraph: (i) "High impact pupil" means a pupil who resides on Indian lands or a pupil who resides on federal property or in low rent housing and whose parent is employed on federal property or low rent housing property or is on active duty in uniformed service, as provided in title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, section 8003(a) (20 United States Code section 7703) and as reported in the application for title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance in the current year. (ii) "Low impact pupil" means a pupil who resides on nonfederal property and has a parent who is employed on federal property or low rent housing property or is on active duty in a uniformed service or a pupil who resides on federal property or in low rent housing and who does not have a parent who is employed on federal property or low rent housing property or is on active duty in uniformed service, as provided in title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, section 8003(a) (20 United States Code section 7703) and as reported in the application for title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance in the current year. 5. Multiply the total number of administrative hours determined in paragraph 4 of this subsection by the hourly rate determined in paragraph 2 of this subsection. 6. Determine the greater of the minimum cost determined in paragraph 1 of this subsection or the product determined in paragraph 5 of this subsection. 7. Add to the amount determined in paragraph 6 of this subsection the amount, if any, to be expended by the school district in the each budget year through an intergovernmental agreement with other school districts or the department of education to provide title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 technical assistance to participating districts. 8. Determine the lesser of the amount determined in paragraph 7 of this subsection or the revenues available as determined in paragraph 3 of this subsection for each budget year. 9. The amount determined in paragraph 8 of this subsection is the maximum amount that may be budgeted for title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 administrative costs for the each budget year as provided in this subsection. 10. If the governing board underestimated the amount that may be budgeted for title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, section 8007 administrative costs for the current year, the board may adjust the general budget limit and the budget before May 15. If the governing board overestimated the amount that may be budgeted for title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 administrative costs for the current year, the board shall adjust the general budget limit and the budget before May 15. Q. If a school district governing board has adopted a budget for a fiscal year based on forms and instructions provided by the auditor general and the department of education for that fiscal year and if, as a result of the enactment or nonenactment of proposed legislation after May 1 of the previous fiscal year, the budget is based on incorrect limits, does not include items authorized by law or does not otherwise conform with law, the governing board may revise its budget at a public hearing on or before September 15 to conform with the law. Not later than September 18, the budget as adjusted shall be submitted electronically to the superintendent of public instruction.  If the governing board does not revise the budget on or before September 15 and if the budget includes any items not authorized by law or if the budget exceeds any limits, the governing board shall adjust or revise the budget as provided in subsection E of this section. R. Notwithstanding any other law, if a school district receives assistance pursuant to title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, the school district shall establish a local level fund designated as the impact aid fund and deposit the impact aid monies received in the fund.  The school district shall separately account for monies in the fund and shall not combine monies in the fund with any other source of local, state or federal assistance.  Monies in the fund shall be expended pursuant to federal law only for the purposes allowed by this title. The school district shall account for monies in the fund according to the uniform system of financial records as prescribed by the auditor general. The superintendent of public instruction shall separately account for monies in each school district's impact aid fund, if an impact aid fund is established, in the annual report required by section 15-255. Monies in the fund are considered federal monies and are not subject to legislative appropriation. S. For the purposes of this section, "title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance" means, for the current year, an amount equal to the final determination of title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance for the fiscal year preceding the current year as confirmed by the division of impact aid, United States department of education or, if a final determination has not been made, the amount estimated by the superintendent of public instruction as confirmed by the division of impact aid, United States department of education and, for the each budget year, an amount equal to the determination of title VIII of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 assistance for the fiscal year preceding the budget year as estimated by the superintendent of public instruction. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 15-915, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-915. Correction of state aid or budget limit errors; definition A. If the superintendent of public instruction determines that the calculation of state aid for a school district or charter school or the calculation of the school district's or charter school's budget limits within the previous three years did not conform with statutory requirements, the superintendent shall require correction of the errors as follows: 1. Corrections may be made in the current year or in the budget year immediately following the current year, except that in case of hardship to the school district, the superintendent may approve corrections partly in one year and partly in the year after that year. 2. Errors in the calculation of state aid shall be corrected by increasing or decreasing the state aid to the school district or charter school in the year or years in which the correction is made. 3. Errors in the calculation of the school district's or charter school's budget limits shall be corrected at a public hearing by requiring the governing board to reduce or by allowing it to increase its budget by the amount of the correction to be made that year. Overbudgeting errors corrected as provided in this paragraph are exempt from section 15-905, subsections L and M. Not later than three days after the hearing and correction, the budget as revised shall be submitted electronically to the superintendent of public instruction. This paragraph does not require a decrease in state aid that is not otherwise required by paragraph 2 of this subsection. B. Subject to the review by the joint legislative budget committee, the superintendent of public instruction shall adjust state aid for a school district in the current year if the governing board of a school district requests the recalculation of state aid for a prior year due to a change in assessed valuation that occurred as the result of any of the following: 1. A court judgment in accordance with section 42-16213. 2. A decision by a county board of equalization in accordance with section 42-16108. 3. A decision by the state board of equalization in accordance with section 42-16162. 4. The correction of a property tax error pursuant to title 42, chapter 16, article 6. C. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, a school district or charter school may not make upward revisions to its average daily membership counts for a particular school year after June 30 of the subsequent school year. D. For the purposes of this section, "state aid": 1. For school districts, means state aid as determined in section 15-971 and additional state aid as determined in section 15-972. 2. For charter schools, means state aid as determined in section 15-185. END_STATUTE